Mississippi, session 2026, SB2213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "Preelection Day Voting Act." SECTION 2.  (1) The preelection day voting period shall begin twenty (20) days before the date of each election and end at 12:00 p.m. on the Saturday immediately before election day.  Any qualified elector may vote in the registrar's office in the county in which the elector is registered to vote during the times established for preelection day voting in this section. (2)  Preelection day voting shall be conducted in the office of the registrar during weekdays from 8:00 a.m. until 5:00 p.m.  During the last full week before an election, the office of the registrar may remain open for preelection voting on weekdays during the lunch hour and from 5:00 p.m. until 7:00 p.m. SECTION 3. (1)  An elector who desires to vote early shall appear at the office of the registrar in the county in which he or she is registered to vote and shall present an acceptable form of photo identification.  After signing the appropriate receipt book, the elector shall cast his or her ballot in the same manner as he or she would at his or her voting precinct on the day of the election.  Except as may be otherwise provided by this act, the election laws that govern procedures for a person who appears to vote on the day of election shall apply when a person appears to vote during the preelection day voting period. (2)  All votes cast at a preelection day voting location shall be final. (3)  The votes cast during preelection voting shall be announced simultaneously with the votes cast on election day. SECTION 4. Each candidate or his or her representatives shall have the right to be present at the office of the registrar when it is open for preelection day voting and to challenge the qualifications of any person offering to vote in the same manner as provided by law at the polling place on election day. SECTION 5. The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate preelection day voting. SECTION 6.  Section 23-15-195, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-195.  All elections by the people shall be by ballot * * *, and shall be concluded in one (1) day. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.